da: Forarbejdningsmetode for kaffe: Anaerob; Carbonic maceration; Honey; Naturlig (tør); Pulped natural; Vasket (våd); Wet hulled / Giling Basah; Andet
zh-CN: 咖啡加工方法: 厌氧处理; 二氧化碳浸渍法; 蜜处理; 日晒（干燥处理）; 半日晒/去果皮日晒; 水洗（湿处理）; 湿刨法 (Giling Basah); 其他
pl: Metoda przetwarzania kawy: Anaerobowa (beztlenowa); Maceracja węglowa; Honey (miodowa); Na sucho (natural); Pulped natural; Na mokro (washed); Wet hulled / Giling Basah; Inna
sl-SI: Metoda obdelave kave: Anaerobno; Karbonska maceracija; Medeni postopek (Honey); Naravno (suho); Pulped Natural; Prano (mokro); Mokro luščeno / Giling Basah; Drugo
nl: Verwerkingsmethode koffie: Anaëroob; Carbonische maceratie; Honey; Natuurlijk (droog); Pulped natural; Gewassen (nat); Wet hulled / giling basah; Overig
zh-TW: 咖啡加工方式: 厭氧處理; 二氧化碳浸漬處理; 蜜處理; 日曬 (乾燥); 半日曬; 水洗 (濕處理); 濕刨法 (Giling Basah); 其他
hr-HR: Način obrade kave: Anaerobno; Ugljična maceracija; Honey postupak; Prirodno (suho); Prirodno pulpirano; Prano (mokro); Mokro ljušteno / Giling Basah; Ostalo
pt-PT: Método de processamento do café: Anaeróbico; Maceração carbónica; Honey; Natural (seco); Natural em polpa; Lavado (húmido); Descasque húmido/giling basah; Outro
nb: Kaffebehandlingsmetode: Anaerob; Karbonmaserasjon; Honey; Naturlig (tørr); Pulped natural; Vasket (våt); Våtskallet / giling basah; Annet
lt-LT: Kavos apdorojimo būdas: Anaerobinis; Angliarūgštinė maceracija; Medaus; Natūralus (sausas); Natūralus be luobelės; Plautas (šlapias); Drėgnas lukštenimas („Giling Basah“); Kita
en: Coffee processing method: Anaerobic; Carbonic Maceration; Honey; Natural (Dry); Pulped Natural; Washed (Wet); Wet Hulled / Giling Basah; Other
de: Kaffeeverarbeitungsmethode: Anaerob; Carbonic Maceration; Honey; Natural (Trocken); Pulped Natural; Washed (Nass); Wet Hulled / Giling Basah; Andere
fi: Kahvin käsittelymenetelmä: Anaerobinen; Hiilihappomaseraatio; Honey; Luonnollinen (kuiva); Pulped Natural; Pesty (märkä); Märkäkuorittu / Giling Basah; Muu
sv: Metod för bearbetning av kaffe: Anaerob; Kolsyremaceration; Honey; Naturlig (torr); Pulped natural; Tvättad (våt); Wet hulled/Giling Basah; Övrigt
ja: コーヒー加工方法: アナエロビック; カーボニックマセレーション; ハニー; ナチュラル (非水洗式); パルプドナチュラル; ウォッシュド (水洗式); ウェットハル / ギリンバサ; その他
ru: Метод обработки кофе: Анаэробная; Углекислотная мацерация; Хани; Натуральная (сухая); Полумытая (Pulped Natural); Мытая (влажная); Вет-халл / Гилинг-басах; Другое
th: วิธีการแปรรูปกาแฟ: แอนแอโรบิก; คาร์บอนิกมาเซอเรชัน; ฮันนี่; ธรรมชาติ (แห้ง); พัลพ์เนเชอรัล; วอชท์ (เปียก); เวตฮัลล์ / Giling Basah; อื่นๆ
el: Μέθοδος επεξεργασίας καφέ: Αναερόβια; Carbonic Maceration; Honey; Natural (Ξηρή); Pulped Natural; Washed (Υγρή); Wet Hulled / Giling Basah; Άλλο
bg-BG: Метод на обработка на кафето: Анаеробен; Въглеродна мацерация; Меден процес; Натурален (сух); Пулпиран натурален; Мит (мокър); Мокро лющене / Giling Basah; Други
hu: Kávé feldolgozásának módja: Anaerob; Szénsavas maceráció; Honey; Natural (száraz); Pulped Natural; Mosott (nedves); Nedves hántolású / Giling Basah; Egyéb
tr: Kahve işleme yöntemi: Anaerobik; Karbonik maserasyon; Bal işlemi; Doğal (Kuru); Pulped natural; Yıkanmış (Islak); Islak kabuk soyma / Giling Basah; Diğer
sk-SK: Spôsob spracovania kávy: Anaeróbne; Karbonická macerácia; Honey (medové); Prírodné (suché); Pulped Natural (polosuché); Premyté (mokré); Wet Hulled (Giling Basah); Iné
es: Método de procesamiento de café: Anaeróbico; Maceración carbónica; Honey; Natural (seco); Natural despulpado; Lavado (húmedo); Trillado húmedo / Giling Basah; Otro
it: Metodo di lavorazione del caffè: Anaerobico; Macerazione carbonica; Honey; Naturale (a secco); Naturale spolpato; Lavato (in umido); Wet Hulled / Giling Basah; Altro
cs: Způsob zpracování kávy: Anaerobní; Karbonická macerace; Medová; Přírodní (suchá); Pulped Natural (polosuchá); Promytá (mokrá); Wet Hulled (Giling Basah); Jiná
pt-BR: Método de processamento de café: Anaeróbico; Maceração carbônica; Honey; Natural (seco); Cereja descascado; Lavado (úmido); Descascado a úmido / Giling Basah; Outros
ro-RO: Metoda de procesare a cafelei: Anaerobă; Macerare carbonică; Honey; Naturală (uscată); Naturală cu pulpă (pulped natural); Spălată (umedă); Decorticare umedă / Giling Basah; Altele
ko: 커피 가공 방법: 무산소; 탄산 침용; 허니; 내추럴(건식); 펄프드 내추럴; 워시드(습식); 웻 헐드 / 길링 바사; 기타
vi: Phương pháp sơ chế cà phê: Lên men yếm khí; Ngâm ủ cacbonic (Carbonic Maceration); Sơ chế mật ong (Honey); Tự nhiên (Khô); Tự nhiên bóc vỏ (Pulped Natural); Rửa sạch (Ướt); Lột vỏ ướt (Giling Basah); Khác
fr: Procédé de traitement du café: Anaérobie; Macération carbonique; Honey; Naturel (voie sèche); Naturel dépulpé; Lavé (voie humide); Décortiqué par voie humide / Giling Basah; Autre